Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-2,121
District or company; hold appropriation; sections; how construed.

Any irrigation district, reclamation district, public power and irrigation district, rural water district, or mutual irrigation or canal company shall hold all water appropriations filed in the district's or company's name for the benefit of the owners of land to which the water appropriations are attached. Sections 46-2,120 to 46-2,129 shall not be construed to modify the rights of landowners to any water appropriation.

Laws 1995, LB 99, § 2.